Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-140
Hearing; rights of person requesting.

A person requesting a hearing pursuant to section 68-139 shall have the following rights:

(1) To examine the county file pertaining to his or her case prior to and during the hearing;

(2) To be represented in the proceedings by a lawyer, friend, relative, or anyone else he or she may select;

(3) To present evidence; and

(4) To confront and cross-examine witnesses.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 10;

Laws 1984, LB 886, § 6.